Idaho, session 2026, H0515.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1631, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1631. REQUIREMENTS FOR HARASSMENT, INTIMIDATION AND OR BULLYING
INFORMATION AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. (1) School districts and public
charter schools shall undertake reasonable efforts to ensure that informa-
tion on harassment, intimidation and or bullying of students, as defined in
section 18-917A, Idaho Code, is disseminated annually to all school person-
nel, parents, and students, including an affirmation that school personnel
are authorized and expected to intervene or facilitate intervention on be-
half of students facing harassment, intimidation or bullying.
(2) School districts and public charter schools shall provide ongoing
professional development to build the skills of all school staff members to
prevent, identify, and respond to harassment, intimidation and or bullying.
The state board of education shall promulgate rules, subject to legislative
approval, regarding the content of the professional development required by
this subsection.
(3) District School district and public charter school policies shall
include a:
(a) A series of graduated consequences that may include, but are
not limited to, referral to counseling, diversion, use of juvenile
specialty courts, restorative practices, on-site suspension, and ex-
pulsion for any student who commits an act of bullying, intimidation,
harassment, intimidation or bullying or an act of violence or threats of
violence. Guidelines for such policies will shall be set forth in the
rules of the state board.; and
(b) In compliance with all federal and state laws protecting student
privacy, a procedure for the mandatory reporting of any incidents of ha-
rassment, intimidation or bullying that result in a student being sus-
pended from school pursuant to section 33-205(6), Idaho Code, to the
parents or legal guardians of both the alleged victim and the alleged
offender involved in the incident.
(4) Annually school districts shall report bullying incidents to the
state department of education in a format set forth in rule by the state
board. District policy shall designate persons to whom bullying reports are
to be made and a procedure for a teacher or other school employee, student,


parent, guardian or other person to report or otherwise provide information
on bullying activity.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.